apertium-ca-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="BBVA__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="PIL__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="TV__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="BBVA">
        <i>BBVA</i> 
        <par n="BBVA__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="FMI">
        <i>FMI</i> 
        <par n="BBVA__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="NATO">
        <i>NATO</i> 
        <par n="TV__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ONU">
        <i>ONU</i> 
        <par n="TV__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="PIL">
        <i>PIL</i> 
        <par n="PIL__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="TV">
        <i>TV</i> 
        <par n="TV__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kg">
        <i>kg</i> 
        <par n="PIL__n" /> 
    </e>
